Utah statutes.
63G-6-105 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Exemptions from chapter -- Compliance with federal law.

(1)  This chapter is not applicable to funds administered under the Percent-for-Art Program of the Utah Percent-for-Art Act.

(2)  This chapter is not applicable to grants awarded by the state or contracts between the state and local public procurement units except as provided in Part 9, Intergovernmental Relations.

(3)  This chapter shall not prevent the state or a local public procurement unit from complying with the terms and conditions of any grant, gift, or bequest that is otherwise consistent with law.

(4)  When a procurement involves the expenditure of federal assistance or contract funds, the chief procurement officer or head of a purchasing agency shall comply with mandatory applicable federal law and regulations not reflected in this chapter.

(5)  This chapter may not supersede the requirements for retention or withholding of construction proceeds and release of construction proceeds as provided in Section 13-8-5.

